New York, session 2025-2026, A6174.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The commissioner of the division of homeland security and 2 emergency services shall conduct an after-action review study of New 3 York state's response to the COVID-19 pandemic. Such study shall explore 4 every facet of New York state's response to the COVID-19 pandemic, 5 including, but not limited to, the level of success or failure of each 6 approach taken by all state and local governmental entities that took 7 specific action in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, including but not 8 limited to, actions of authorities and implementation of operations, 9 logistics, resource management, communications, policies, and such state 10 and local governmental entities' relationships with the centers for 11 disease control and prevention. 12 § 2. No later than one year after the effective date of this act, the 13 commissioner of the division of homeland security and emergency services 14 shall submit a report on the findings of the study under section one of 15 this act to the governor, the temporary president of the senate, the 16 speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of the senate, and the 17 minority leader of the assembly. Such report shall be divided into the 18 following three sections: (i) an identification of the issue or issues; 19 (ii) a discussion of such issue or issues; and (iii) recommendations to 20 mitigate the effects of any potential future pandemics. Such report 21 shall also be made public on the division of homeland security and emer- 22 gency services' website and shared with the federal centers for disease 23 control and prevention. 24 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 25 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05490-01-5